California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(u) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are
 updated.

(v) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) and paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (i) shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation.

(w) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized and if any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 74.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.38.

(a) The principal and interest of a 529 savings plan shall be excluded from consideration for purposes of any asset or resources test to determine eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits with respect to an applicant or beneficiary whose eligibility is not determined using MAGI-based financial methods. 

(b) The qualified distributions from a 529 savings account shall be excluded from consideration for purposes of any income test to determine eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits with respect to an applicant or beneficiary.

(c) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “529 savings plan” means a qualified tuition program that satisfies the requirements of Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “MAGI-based financial methods” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) as originally enacted and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education
 Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(d) The department shall seek any necessary approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement this section. The department shall implement this section only in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations, and only to the extent that the necessary approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   (AB 1785)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.39.

(a) If a county has facts clearly demonstrating that a Medi-Cal beneficiary cannot be eligible for Medi-Cal due to an event, such as death or change of state residency, Medi-Cal benefits shall be terminated without a redetermination under Section 14005.37.

(b) Whenever Medi-Cal eligibility is terminated without a redetermination, as provided
 in subdivision (a), the Medi-Cal eligibility worker shall record that fact or event causing the eligibility termination in the beneficiary’s file, along with a certification that a full redetermination could not result in a finding of Medi-Cal eligibility. Following this certification, a notice of action specifying the basis for termination of Medi-Cal eligibility shall be sent to the beneficiary.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six
 months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(d) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available and necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 442, Sec. 7.   (SB 28)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.40.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise its option under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(X) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(X)), to implement a program for aged and disabled persons as described in Section 1902(m) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(m)(1)).

(b) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the blind shall be included within the definition of disabled for the purposes of the program established in this section.

(c) An individual shall satisfy the financial eligibility requirement of this program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Countable income, as determined in accordance with Section 1902(m) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(m)), does not exceed an income level equal to 100 percent of the applicable federal poverty level.

(2) (A) Until the time that the department obtains federal approval for the income disregard described in paragraph (3), countable income shall include an additional two hundred thirty dollars ($230) for an individual or, in the case of a couple, three hundred ten dollars ($310).

(B) Upon receipt of federal approval for, and implementation of, paragraph (3), this paragraph
 shall become inoperative. The director shall execute a declaration, which shall be retained by the director, stating that federal approval for paragraph (3) has been obtained and the date
 that
 paragraph (3) shall be implemented. The director shall post the declaration on the department’s internet website.

(3) (A) Pursuant to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)), all countable income over 100 percent of the federal poverty level, up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level, shall be disregarded, after taking all other disregards, deductions, and exclusions into account for those persons eligible pursuant to this section.

(B) The department shall seek federal approval to implement this paragraph.

(4) (A) For the purposes of calculating countable income under this section, an income exemption shall be applied as necessary to adjust the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled (SSI/SSP) payment level as used in this section so that it is the same as the SSI/SSP payment level that was in place on May 1, 2009.

(B) This additional income exemption shall cease to be implemented when the SSI/SSP payment levels increase beyond those in effect on May 1, 2009.

(C) The income level determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not be less than the SSI/SSP payment level the individual receives or would receive as a disabled
 or blind individual or, in the case of a couple, the SSI/SSP payment level the couple receives or would receive as a disabled or blind couple.

(5) Countable resources, as determined in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62, do not exceed the maximum levels established in that section.

(d) The financial eligibility requirements provided in subdivision (c) may be adjusted upwards to reflect the cost of living in California, contingent upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by
 January 1, 2030, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations are adopted.

(f) For purposes of calculating income under this section during any calendar year, increases in social security benefit payments under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.) arising from cost-of-living adjustments shall be disregarded commencing in the month that these social security benefit payments are increased by the cost-of-living adjustment through the month before the month in which a change in the federal poverty level requires the department to modify the income level described in subdivision (c).

(g) (1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “SSI” means the federal Supplemental Security Income program established under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) “Income level” means the applicable income level specified in subdivision (c).

(C) The board and care “personal care services” or “PCS” deduction refers to an income disregard that is applied to a resident in a licensed community care facility in lieu of the board and care deduction (equal to the amount by which the basic board and care rate exceeds the income level in subparagraph (B)) when the PCS deduction is greater than the board and care deduction.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, the SSI recipient retention amount is the amount by which the SSI maximum payment amount to an individual residing in a licensed community care facility exceeds the maximum amount that the state allows community care facilities to charge a resident who is an SSI recipient.

(B) For the purposes of this section, the personal and incidental needs deduction for an individual residing in a licensed community care facility is one of the following:

(i) If the board and care deduction is applicable to the individual, the amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than
 zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to the individual’s licensed community care facility and the SSI recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s income level, the individual’s board and care deduction, and twenty dollars ($20).

(ii) If the PCS deduction specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) is applicable to the individual, an amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to the individual’s community care facility and the SSI recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s income level, the individual’s PCS deduction, and twenty dollars ($20).

(3) In determining the countable income under this section of an individual residing in a licensed community care facility, the
 individual shall have deducted from the individual’s income the amount specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(h) No later than one month after the effective date of subdivision (g), the department shall submit to the federal Medicaid program administrator a state plan amendment seeking approval of the income deduction specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g), and of federal financial participation for the costs resulting from that income deduction.

(i) The deduction prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) shall be applied no later than the first day of the fourth month after the month in which the department receives approval for the federal financial participation specified in subdivision (h). Until approval for federal financial participation is received, there shall be no deduction under paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(j) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(k) Paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be implemented after the director determines, and communicates that determination in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), but no sooner than January 1, 2020.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 80) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 56.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.40.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise its option under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(X) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(X)), to implement a program for aged and disabled persons as described in Section 1902(m) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(m)(1)).

(b) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the blind shall be included within the definition of disabled for the purposes of the program established in this section.

(c) An individual shall satisfy the financial eligibility requirement of this program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Countable income, as determined in accordance with Section 1902(m) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(m)), does not exceed an income level equal to 100 percent of the applicable federal poverty level.

(2) (A) Until the time that the department obtains federal approval for the income disregard described in paragraph (3), countable income shall include an additional two hundred thirty dollars ($230) for an individual or, in the case of a couple, three hundred ten dollars ($310).

(B) Upon receipt of federal approval for, and implementation of, paragraph (3), this paragraph shall become inoperative. The director shall execute a declaration, which shall be retained by the director, stating that federal approval for paragraph (3) has been obtained and the date that paragraph (3)
 shall be implemented. The director shall post the declaration on the department’s internet website.

(3) (A) Pursuant to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)), all countable income over 100 percent of the federal poverty level, up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level, shall be disregarded, after taking all other disregards, deductions, and exclusions into account for those persons eligible pursuant to this section.

(B) The department shall seek federal approval to implement this paragraph.

(4) (A) For the purposes of calculating countable income under this section, an income exemption shall be applied as necessary to adjust the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled
 (SSI/SSP) payment level as used in this section so that it is the same as the SSI/SSP payment level that was in place on May 1, 2009.

(B) This additional income exemption shall cease to be implemented when the SSI/SSP payment levels increase beyond those in effect on May 1, 2009.

(C) The income level determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not be less than the SSI/SSP payment level the individual receives or would receive as a disabled or blind individual or, in the case of a couple, the SSI/SSP payment level the couple receives or would receive as a disabled or blind couple.

(5) Countable resources, including property or other assets, shall not be considered in determining eligibility.

(d) The financial eligibility requirements provided in
 subdivision (c) may be adjusted upwards to reflect the cost of living in California, contingent upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2023, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until
 regulations are adopted.

(f) For purposes of calculating income under this section during any calendar year, increases in social security benefit payments under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.) arising from cost-of-living adjustments shall be disregarded commencing in the month that these social security benefit payments are increased by the cost-of-living adjustment through the month before the month in which a change in the federal poverty level requires the department to modify the income level described in subdivision (c).

(g) (1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “SSI” means the federal Supplemental Security Income program established under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) “Income level” means the applicable income level specified in subdivision (c).

(C) The board and care “personal care services” or “PCS” deduction refers to an income disregard that is applied to a resident in a licensed community care facility in lieu of the board and care deduction (equal to the amount by which the basic board and care rate exceeds the income level in subparagraph (B)) when the PCS deduction is greater than the board and care deduction.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, the SSI recipient retention amount is the amount by which the SSI maximum payment amount to an individual residing in a licensed community care facility exceeds the maximum amount that the state allows community care facilities to charge a resident who is an SSI recipient.

(B) For the purposes of this section, the personal and incidental needs deduction for an individual residing in a licensed community care facility is one of the following:

(i) If the board and care deduction is applicable to the individual, the amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to the individual’s licensed community care facility and the SSI recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s income level, the individual’s board and care deduction, and twenty dollars ($20).

(ii) If the PCS deduction specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) is applicable to the individual, an amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount
 exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to the individual’s community care facility and the SSI recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s income level, the individual’s PCS deduction, and twenty dollars ($20).

(3) In determining the countable income under this section of an individual residing in a licensed community care facility, the individual shall have deducted from the individual’s income the amount specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(h) No later than one month after the effective date of subdivision (g), the department shall submit to the federal Medicaid program administrator a state plan amendment seeking approval of the income deduction specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g), and of federal financial participation for the costs resulting from that income
 deduction.

(i) The deduction prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) shall be applied no later than the first day of the fourth month after the month in which the department receives approval for the federal financial participation specified in subdivision (h). Until approval for federal financial participation is received, there shall be no deduction under paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(j) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(k) Paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be implemented after the director determines, and communicates that determination in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), but no sooner than January 1, 2020.

(l) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 81) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 57.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 56 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.401.

(a) The department shall seek a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver to implement an income disregard that would allow an aged, blind, or disabled individual who becomes ineligible for benefits under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14005.40 because of the state’s payment of the individual’s Medicare Part B premiums to remain eligible for the Medi-Cal program under Section 14005.40 if their income and resources otherwise meet all eligibility requirements.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or
 similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by January 1, 2030, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 82) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 60.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.401.

(a) The department shall seek a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver to implement an income disregard that would allow an aged, blind, or disabled individual who becomes ineligible for benefits under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14005.40 because of the state’s payment of the individual’s Medicare Part B premiums to remain eligible for the Medi-Cal program under Section 14005.40 if their income otherwise meets all eligibility requirements.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar
 instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2021, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Commencing six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 83) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 61.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 60 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.41.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall deem to have met the income documentation requirements for participation in the Medi-Cal program, without a spend down of excess income, any child who is less than six years of age and who has been determined to be eligible for free meals through a federally funded program using the National School Lunch Program application provided for pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1751) of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, with regard to any child who is enrolled in and attending public school in the State of California, the department shall accept documentation of enrollment for free meals under the National School Lunch Program as sufficient documentation of California residency for that child for the purposes of the Medi-Cal program.

(c) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, each county shall participate in a statewide pilot project to determine Medi-Cal program eligibility for any child under six years of age and currently enrolled in school in the State of California who is eligible for free meals under the National
 School Lunch Program upon receipt of proof of participation in the National School Lunch Program and a signed Medi-Cal application, which may be the supplemented application, described in subdivision (i). Counties shall notify the parent or guardian of the results of the eligibility determination.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, each county shall participate in a statewide pilot project to use the procedure described in this subdivision to determine Medi-Cal eligibility without a spend down of excess income, and, if eligible, shall enroll in the Medi-Cal program, any child six years of age or older currently enrolled in school in the State of
 California who is eligible for free meals under the National School Lunch Program, upon receipt of proof of participation in the National School Lunch Program and a signed Medi-Cal application, which may be the supplemented application, described in subdivision (i). If the county determines from the supplemented application described in subdivision (i) that the child meets the eligibility requirements for participation in the Medi-Cal program, the county shall notify the parent or guardian that the child has been found eligible for the Medi-Cal program. If the county is unable to determine from the information on the application as described in subdivision (i) whether the child is eligible, the county shall contact the family to seek any additional information regarding income, household composition, or deductions that the department, in consultation with the county welfare departments, may determine to be necessary to complete the Medi-Cal application. If the county determines that the child does not meet
 the income eligibility requirements for participation in the full-scope no-cost Medi-Cal program, the county shall notify the parent or guardian of the determination and shall forward the school lunch application and any supplemental forms as described in subdivision (i) to the Healthy Families Program. If an applicant is determined to be ineligible for the full-scope no-cost Medi-Cal program and for the Healthy Families Program, the school lunch application and any supplemental forms as described in subdivision (i) shall be forwarded to a county- or local-sponsored health insurance program, as applicable, if the parent or guardian has provided consent. For purposes of this section, a county- or local-sponsored health insurance program includes a county agency, a local initiative, a county-organized health system, or other local entity that provides health care coverage to children who do not qualify for the full-scope no-cost Medi-Cal program or for the Healthy Families Program.

(2) Each county shall ask the parent or guardian of each child identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and the parent or guardian of each child whom the county determines to meet the income eligibility requirements for participation in the Medi-Cal program under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) to provide additional documentation as required by current law necessary for retention of eligibility in the Medi-Cal program. If a parent or guardian does not provide the documentation required for retention of full-scope Medi-Cal program eligibility, the county shall continue the child’s enrollment in the Medi-Cal program, but only for the limited scope of Medi-Cal program benefits as described in Section 14007.5. If applicable, the county shall also forward the school lunch application and any supplemental forms as described in subdivision (i), for applicants who are determined to be ineligible for the full-scope no-cost Medi-Cal program and for
 the Healthy Families Program, to a county- or local-sponsored health insurance program if the parent or guardian has provided consent.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the department from verifying eligibility through the Income Eligibility Verification System match mandated by Section 1137 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320b-7) or from requesting additional information or documentation required by federal law.

(e) Each county shall include its cost of implementing this section in its annual Medi-Cal administrative budget requests submitted to the department.

(f) For purposes of this section, the Medi-Cal program application date shall be the date on which the school lunch application information is received by the local agency determining eligibility under the
 Medi-Cal program.

(g) (1) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available for the services provided and only for the period of time the free National School Lunch Program utilizes a gross income standard at or below 133 percent of the federal poverty level. This section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with any federal approval.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the department determines that one or more state plan amendments are necessary to ensure full federal financial participation in the provisions of this section, the department shall prepare and submit requests for the state plan amendments to the federal government, after which this section shall not be implemented until the department receives approval of all necessary state plan amendments.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (g), not later than March 1, 2003, the department, in consultation with the State Department of Education and representatives of the school districts, county superintendents of schools, local agencies that administer the Medi-Cal program, consumer advocates, and other stakeholders, shall develop and distribute the policies and procedures, including any all-county letters, necessary to implement Section 49557.2 of the Education Code and this section.

(2) The policies and procedures required to be developed and distributed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, both of the following:

(A) Processes for the school districts, county superintendents of schools, and local agencies that administer the Medi-Cal program to use in forwarding and processing
 free school lunch application information pursuant to Section 49557.2 of the Education Code, and in following up with the applicants to obtain any necessary documentation required by federal law.

(B) Instructions for implementing the eligibility provisions of this chapter.

(3) The policies and procedures required to be developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall specify all of the following:

(A) The information on the school lunch application may be used to initiate a Medi-Cal program application only when the applicant has provided their consent pursuant to Section 49557.2 of the Education Code.

(B) The date of the Medi-Cal program application shall be the date on which the school lunch application was received by the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program.

(C) The county, in determining eligibility for the Medi-Cal program, shall request additional documentation only as required by federal law, and shall enroll any child whose parent or guardian does not provide the necessary documentation for full-scope benefits under the Medi-Cal program in the Medi-Cal program with limited scope benefits, as described in Section 14007.5.

(i) To the extent federal financial participation is available, and to the extent administratively feasible, the department shall utilize the free National School Lunch Program application developed under Section 49557.2 of the Education Code, if supplemented as
 needed by simplified forms and disclosures, including Medi-Cal rights and responsibility notices and privacy notices, as a Medi-Cal application for children described in this section.

(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(k) The department shall review the effectiveness of the statewide pilot project and make recommendations regarding appropriate ways to expand the use of the approaches contained in this section.

(l) In order to expedite health coverage for children who have been determined eligible for free meals under the National School Lunch Program, the department, at its discretion, may choose to implement this section in whole or in part by exercising the option described in Section 1396r-1a of Title 42 of the United States Code to allow information provided on the National School Lunch Program application referred to, and supplemented as described, in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 49557.2 of the Education Code to serve as a basis for a preliminary eligibility determination by a qualified entity designated by the department.

(m) County- and local-sponsored health program agencies are authorized to use the supplemental application described in subdivision (i) and received pursuant to subdivision (c) to make an eligibility determination for those respective programs,
 and shall request additional information only as needed to complete the eligibility process.

(n) A county may, at its option, and with the consent of the parent or guardian as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 49557.2 of the Education Code, notify the school of the names and contact information of children who are in jeopardy of losing accelerated Medi-Cal coverage because a child’s parent or guardian has not provided required followup information to the county. This notice shall be limited to the names and contact information, and shall not specify what information is missing. This shall be done for the sole purpose of enabling the school, at its option, to conduct outreach activities to encourage or assist those parents or guardians to complete and submit the required followup information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 84.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.42.

(a) The department shall provide full-scope benefits under this chapter, without spend down of excess income, to all individuals on behalf of whom kinship guardians are receiving aid under any of the Kinship Guardian Assistance Payment Programs pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department and the State Department of Social Services may implement, without
 taking regulatory action, this section by means of all county letters or similar instruction. Thereafter, as needed, the departments shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) To the extent that federal financial participation is not available, the cost of benefits provided under this section shall be covered only by state funds.

(d) The department and the State Department of Social Services shall work cooperatively to develop procedures that maximize the availability of federal financial participation for the cost of benefits provided under this section. The procedures shall include conforming the application and eligibility determination process for this population to meet the requirements of federal Medicaid law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 85.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.50.

(a) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option made available under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(I) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(I)) to extend full-scope Medi-Cal benefits to individuals who are ineligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits under a program listed in subdivision (c) as a result of the July 1, 2009, reduction in the SSI/SSP program maximum aid payments pursuant to Section 12200.019, or any subsequent reductions in maximum aid
 payments.

(b) The programs authorized under this section shall utilize the income and resource standards and methodologies of the SSI/SSP program and in addition an income disregard shall be applied as necessary to adjust the income standard to that which was in place for the affected program on May 1, 2009.

(c) (1) The SSI/SSP program under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) The Pickle program under the Pickle Amendment to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Public Law 94-566).

(3) The Disabled Adult Child program under Section 1634 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1383c).

(4) The Disabled Widow or Widower program under
 Section 1634 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1383c).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), for the purposes of this section, for blind individuals who meet the criteria for blindness as set forth in Section 1614(a)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382c(a)(2)), but who have not been determined to be disabled in accordance with Section 1614(a)(3) of that Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382c(a)(3)), the income and resource standards and methodologies applied in determining eligibility under this section shall be identical to that of the Aged and Disabled Federal Poverty Level program under Section 14005.40.
